Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 6. PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE A. PROVISIONS GENERALLY APPLICABLE TO PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 614. PEACE OFFICERS AND FIRE FIGHTERS

SUBCHAPTER A. LEGISLATIVE LEAVE FOR PEACE OFFICER OR FIRE FIGHTER

Sec. 614.001. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Employer" means the governmental entity that employs or appoints a peace officer or fire fighter or that the peace officer or fire fighter is elected to serve.

(2) "Fire fighter" means a member of a fire department who performs a function listed in Section 143.003(4), Local Government Code, without regard to whether the individual is subject to a civil service system or program.

Text of subdivision effective until January 01, 2025

(3) "Peace officer" means an individual elected, appointed, or employed to serve as a peace officer for a governmental entity under Article 2.12, Code of Criminal Procedure, or other law.

Text of subdivision effective on January 01, 2025

(3) "Peace officer" means an individual elected, appointed, or employed to serve as a peace officer for a governmental entity under Article 2A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure, or other law.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.105, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 614.002. APPLICABILITY OF SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter applies only to a peace officer or fire fighter employed by:

(1) the state;

(2) a municipality with a population of 50,000 or more; or

(3) a county with a population of 190,000 or more.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 352 (H.B. 1177), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 614.003. ENTITLEMENT TO LEGISLATIVE LEAVE. A peace officer or fire fighter is entitled as provided by this subchapter to legislative leave to serve in, appear before, or petition a governmental body during a regular or special session of the body.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 614.004. ELIGIBILITY FOR LEGISLATIVE LEAVE. (a) To be eligible for legislative leave, a peace officer or fire fighter must submit a written application to the individual's employer on or before the 30th day before the date the individual intends to begin the legislative leave.

(b) The application must state the length of the requested leave and that the peace officer or fire fighter is willing to reimburse the employer for any wages, pension, or other costs the employer will incur as a result of the leave.

(c) The length of requested leave may not exceed the length of the session.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 614.005. MONEY REQUIRED TO OFFSET COSTS OF LEGISLATIVE LEAVE. (a) An employer may require reimbursement of all costs associated with legislative leave under this subchapter.

(b) Within 30 days after the date an employer receives an application, the employer shall notify the peace officer or fire fighter in writing of the actual amount of money required to offset the costs the employer will incur.

(c) An employer may require a peace officer or fire fighter to post the money before granting the leave.

(d) A peace officer or fire fighter shall give to the employer a sworn statement identifying the source of the money posted.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 614.006. EMPLOYER TO GRANT LEGISLATIVE LEAVE; EXCEPTIONS. An employer shall grant legislative leave to a peace officer or fire fighter who submits an application as prescribed by this subchapter and who complies with any requirement relating to payment of costs:

(1) except in an emergency; or

(2) unless granting the leave will result in having an insufficient number of employees to carry out the normal functions of the employer.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 614.007. INSUFFICIENCY IN NUMBER OF EMPLOYEES; EXCHANGE OF TIME BY OTHER EMPLOYEES. (a) If an employer determines that granting a legislative leave will result in having an insufficient number of employees to carry out the normal functions of the employer, another peace officer or fire fighter of equal rank may volunteer to exchange time of work with the applicant if overtime does not result.

(b) The employer shall allow a volunteer under Subsection (a) to work for the applicant and shall grant the legislative leave, if overtime will not result and if the volunteer work will result in having a sufficient number of employees.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 614.008. LEGISLATIVE LEAVE NOT A BREAK IN SERVICE. Legislative leave under this subchapter is not a break in service for any purpose and is treated as any other paid leave, except as provided by Section 614.005.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 614.009. LEGISLATIVE LEAVE TO ATTEND SESSION OF CONGRESS. Legislative leave granted under this subchapter to a peace officer or fire fighter to attend a session of the Congress of the United States shall be granted for not longer than 30 percent of the applicant's total annual working days during each year in which leave is requested.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 614.010. EMPLOYEES' ASSOCIATION MAY NOT REIMBURSE CERTAIN COSTS. A peace officers' or fire fighters' association may not reimburse a member of the legislature or an employer of a peace officer or fire fighter who serves as a member of the legislature for wages, pension contributions, or other costs incurred as a result of legislative leave taken under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER A-1. MENTAL HEALTH LEAVE

Sec. 614.015. MENTAL HEALTH LEAVE FOR PEACE OFFICERS AND TELECOMMUNICATORS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Law enforcement agency" means an agency of the state or of a political subdivision of the state authorized by law to employ peace officers.

(2) "Telecommunicator" means a person authorized to act as a telecommunicator under Section 1701.405, Occupations Code.

(b) Each law enforcement agency, and each agency of the state or of a political subdivision of the state that employs a full-time telecommunicator, shall develop and adopt a policy allowing the use of mental health leave by the peace officers and full-time telecommunicators, as applicable, employed by the agency who experience a traumatic event in the scope of that employment.

(c) A mental health leave policy adopted under this section must:

(1) provide clear and objective guidelines establishing the circumstances under which a peace officer or telecommunicator is granted and may use mental health leave;

(2) entitle a peace officer or telecommunicator to mental health leave without a deduction in salary or other compensation;

(3) enumerate the number of mental health leave days available to a peace officer or telecommunicator; and

(4) detail the level of anonymity for a peace officer or telecommunicator who takes mental health leave.

(d) A mental health leave policy adopted under this section may provide a list of mental health services available to peace officers and telecommunicators in the area of the law enforcement or employing agency.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 396 (S.B. 1359), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1119 (H.B. 1486), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER B. COMPLAINT AGAINST LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER

OR FIRE FIGHTER

Sec. 614.021. APPLICABILITY OF SUBCHAPTER.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), this subchapter applies only to a complaint against:

(1) a law enforcement officer of the State of Texas, including an officer of the Department of Public Safety or of the Texas Alcoholic Beverage Commission;

(2) a fire fighter who is employed by this state or a political subdivision of this state;

(3) a peace officer under Article 2.12, Code of Criminal Procedure, or other law who is appointed or employed by a political subdivision of this state; or

(4) a detention officer or county jailer who is appointed or employed by a political subdivision of this state.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), this subchapter applies only to a complaint against:

(1) a law enforcement officer of the State of Texas, including an officer of the Department of Public Safety or of the Texas Alcoholic Beverage Commission;

(2) a fire fighter who is employed by this state or a political subdivision of this state;

(3) a peace officer under Article 2A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure, or other law who is appointed or employed by a political subdivision of this state; or

(4) a detention officer or county jailer who is appointed or employed by a political subdivision of this state.

(b) This subchapter does not apply to a peace officer or fire fighter appointed or employed by a political subdivision that is covered by a meet and confer or collective bargaining agreement under Chapter 143 or 174, Local Government Code, if that agreement includes provisions relating to the investigation of, and disciplinary action resulting from, a complaint against a peace officer or fire fighter, as applicable.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 507 (H.B. 639), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.106, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 614.022. COMPLAINT TO BE IN WRITING AND SIGNED BY COMPLAINANT. To be considered by the head of a state agency or by the head of a fire department or local law enforcement agency, the complaint must be:

(1) in writing; and

(2) signed by the person making the complaint.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 507 (H.B. 639), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 614.023. COPY OF COMPLAINT TO BE GIVEN TO OFFICER OR EMPLOYEE. (a) A copy of a signed complaint against a law enforcement officer of this state or a fire fighter, detention officer, county jailer, or peace officer appointed or employed by a political subdivision of this state shall be given to the officer or employee within a reasonable time after the complaint is filed.

(b) Disciplinary action may not be taken against the officer or employee unless a copy of the signed complaint is given to the officer or employee.

(c) In addition to the requirement of Subsection (b), the officer or employee may not be indefinitely suspended or terminated from employment based on the subject matter of the complaint unless:

(1) the complaint is investigated; and

(2) there is evidence to prove the allegation of misconduct.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 507 (H.B. 639), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

SUBCHAPTER C. PROHIBITION AGAINST COLLECTING DEBT FOR ANOTHER

Sec. 614.041. COLLECTING DEBT FOR ANOTHER; OFFENSE. (a) A peace officer commits an offense if the officer:

(1) accepts for collection or undertakes the collection of a claim for debt for another, unless the officer acts under a law that prescribes the duties of the officer; or

(2) accepts compensation not prescribed by law for accepting for collection or undertaking the collection of a claim for debt for another.

(b) An offense under Subsection (a) is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than $200 or more than $500.

(c) In addition to the fine, the peace officer may be removed from office.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER D. PURCHASE OF FIREARM OR UNIFORM OF HONORABLY RETIRED, MEDICALLY DISCHARGED, OR DECEASED PEACE OFFICER

Sec. 614.0505. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "governmental entity" means a state agency, a county, a municipality, or a joint board for which the constituent agencies are populous home-rule municipalities.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 359 (H.B. 2135), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 614.051. PURCHASE OF FIREARM BY HONORABLY RETIRED PEACE OFFICER. (a) An individual may purchase a firearm from a governmental entity if:

(1) the individual was a peace officer commissioned by the entity;

(2) the individual was honorably retired from the individual's commission by the entity;

(3) the firearm had been previously issued to the individual by the entity; and

(4) the firearm is not a prohibited weapon under Section 46.05, Penal Code.

(b) An individual may purchase only one firearm from a governmental entity under this section.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 14.37, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 359 (H.B. 2135), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 614.052. PURCHASE OF FIREARM BY SURVIVING SPOUSE, CHILD, OR PARENT OF DECEASED PEACE OFFICER. (a) An individual listed under Subsection (b) may purchase a firearm from a governmental entity if:

(1) the firearm had been previously issued by the entity to a peace officer commissioned by the entity who died while commissioned, without regard to whether the officer died while discharging the officer's official duties; and

(2) the firearm is not a prohibited weapon under Section 46.05, Penal Code.

(b) Individuals who may purchase the firearm under Subsection (a) are, in order of precedence:

(1) the surviving spouse of the deceased peace officer;

(2) a child of the deceased peace officer; and

(3) a parent of the deceased peace officer.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 14.38, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 359 (H.B. 2135), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 614.053. PURCHASE PRICE OF FIREARM. A governmental entity shall establish the amount, which may not exceed fair market value, for which a firearm may be purchased under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 359 (H.B. 2135), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 614.054. WHEN FIREARM MAY BE PURCHASED; DELAY OF SALE BY GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), an individual must purchase a firearm under Section 614.051 before the second anniversary of the date of the person's retirement or under Section 614.052 before the second anniversary of the date of the officer's death.

(b) A governmental entity that cannot immediately replace the firearm may delay the sale of the firearm until the entity can replace the firearm.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 359 (H.B. 2135), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 359 (H.B. 2135), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 614.055. PURCHASE OF UNIFORM ISSUED TO HONORABLY RETIRED AND CERTAIN MEDICALLY DISCHARGED STATE PEACE OFFICERS. (a) An individual may purchase a uniform from a state agency if:

(1) the individual was a peace officer commissioned by the agency;

(2) the individual was honorably retired or medically discharged under conditions other than dishonorable from the individual's commission by the agency; and

(3) the uniform had been previously issued to the individual by the agency.

(b) The nearest surviving relative of an individual described by Subsection (a) may purchase the individual's uniform from the state agency.

(c) A state agency shall establish the amount, which may not exceed fair market value, for which a uniform may be purchased under this section.

(d) An individual who purchases a uniform or on whose behalf a uniform is purchased under this section may be buried in the uniform.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 218 (H.B. 315), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER E. POLYGRAPH EXAMINATIONS

Text of section effective until January 01, 2025

Sec. 614.061. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "peace officer" means a person who:

(1) is elected, appointed, or employed by a governmental entity; and

(2) is a peace officer under Article 2.12, Code of Criminal Procedure, or other law.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1303, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.107, eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on January 01, 2025

Sec. 614.061. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "peace officer" means a person who:

(1) is elected, appointed, or employed by a governmental entity; and

(2) is a peace officer under Article 2A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure, or other law.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1303, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.107, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 614.062. APPLICABILITY OF SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter does not apply to a peace officer to whom Section 411.007 applies.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1303, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 1997.

Sec. 614.063. POLYGRAPH EXAMINATION. (a) A peace officer may not be suspended, discharged, or subjected to any other form of employment discrimination by the organization employing or appointing the peace officer because the peace officer refuses to submit to a polygraph examination as part of an internal investigation regarding the conduct of the peace officer unless:

(1) the complainant submits to and passes a polygraph examination; or

(2) the peace officer is ordered to take an examination under Subsection (d) or (e).

(b) Subsection (a)(1) does not apply if the complainant is physically or mentally incapable of being polygraphed.

(c) For the purposes of this section, a person passes a polygraph examination if, in the opinion of the polygraph examiner, no deception is indicated regarding matters critical to the matter under investigation.

(d) The head of the law enforcement organization that employs or appoints a peace officer may require the peace officer to submit to a polygraph examination under this subsection if:

(1) the subject matter of the complaint is confined to the internal operations of the organization employing or appointing the peace officer;

(2) the complainant is an employee or appointee of the organization employing or appointing the peace officer; and

(3) the complaint does not appear to be invalid based on the information available when the polygraph is ordered.

(e) The head of the law enforcement organization that employs or appoints a peace officer may require the peace officer to submit to a polygraph examination under this subsection if the head of the law enforcement organization considers the circumstances to be extraordinary and the head of the law enforcement organization believes that the integrity of a peace officer or the law enforcement organization is in question. The head of the law enforcement organization shall provide the peace officer with a written explanation of the nature of the extraordinary circumstances and how the integrity of a peace officer or the law enforcement organization is in question.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1303, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER F. RURAL VOLUNTEER FIRE DEPARTMENT INSURANCE PROGRAM

Sec. 614.071. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Director" means the director of the Texas Forest Service.

(2) "Fund" means the rural volunteer fire department insurance fund.

(3) "Partially paid fire department" means a fire department operated by its members that includes:

(A) some volunteer members; and

(B) not more than 20 paid members.

(4) "Program" means the rural volunteer fire department insurance program.

(5) "Service" means the Texas Forest Service, an agency of The Texas A&M University System.

(6) "Volunteer fire department" means a fire department operated by its members, including a partially paid fire department, that:

(A) is operated on a not-for-profit basis, including a department exempt from federal income tax under Section 501(a), Internal Revenue Code of 1986, by being listed as an exempt organization in Section 501(c)(3) of that code; and

(B) participates in a firefighter certification program administered:

(i) under Section 419.071;

(ii) by the State Firemen's and Fire Marshals' Association of Texas; or

(iii) by the National Wildfire Coordinating Group.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1363, Sec. 1, eff. Oct. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 614.072. ADMINISTRATION OF PROGRAM. (a) The Texas Forest Service shall administer the rural volunteer fire department insurance program established under this subchapter.

(b) The director may adopt rules necessary to assist rural volunteer fire departments in the payment of:

(1) workers' compensation insurance;

(2) audit costs for workers' compensation claims in any year in which there is an abnormally high number of wildfires; and

(3) accidental death and disability insurance.

(c) The service may employ staff to administer the program.

(d) The director shall, in consultation with the advisory committee appointed under Section 614.073:

(1) determine reasonable criteria and qualifications for the distribution of money from the fund; and

(2) establish a procedure for reporting and processing requests for money from the fund.

(e) In developing the criteria and qualifications for the distribution of money from the fund under Subsection (d), the director may not prohibit a volunteer fire department from receiving funds from a political subdivision.

(f) The director shall prepare an annual written report on the activity, status, and effectiveness of the fund and shall submit the report to the lieutenant governor and the speaker of the house of representatives before September 1 of each year.

(g) Any assistance provided under this subchapter to a volunteer fire department or a firefighter who is a member of a volunteer fire department may not be considered compensation, and a firefighter receiving assistance under this subchapter may not be considered to be in the paid service of any governing body.

(h) Administration costs associated with the program during a state fiscal year may not exceed seven percent of the total deposited to the credit of the fund as required by Section 151.801(c-2), Tax Code, during the previous fiscal year.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1363, Sec. 1, eff. Oct. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1248 (H.B. 2667), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 471 (S.B. 761), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1203 (S.B. 1455), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 614.073. ADVISORY COMMITTEE. (a) The director shall appoint an advisory committee to advise the director in regard to the administration of the program.

(b) The advisory committee consists of five members with one member appointed from each of the following geographic regions of the state: north, south, east, west, and central.

(c) A member of the advisory committee is entitled to reimbursement of reasonable travel expenses incurred by the member in performing duties as a member of the advisory committee, subject to any applicable limitation on reimbursement provided by general law or the General Appropriations Act. A member may not receive compensation for services.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1363, Sec. 1, eff. Oct. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 614.074. REQUESTS FOR ASSISTANCE. (a) A request for assistance from the fund shall be submitted to the director.

(b) On receiving a request for assistance, the director shall determine whether to provide assistance and the amount of the assistance to be provided, if any, based on the criteria developed in consultation with the advisory committee under Section 614.072. A written copy of the decision shall be sent to the requestor and each member of the advisory committee.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1363, Sec. 1, eff. Oct. 1, 2001.

Sec. 614.075. FUND. (a) The rural volunteer fire department insurance fund is an account in the general revenue fund and is composed of money deposited as required by Section 151.801(c-2), Tax Code, and contributions to the fund from any other source.

(b) Money in the fund may be used only for a purpose under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1363, Sec. 1, eff. Oct. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 471 (S.B. 761), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER G. RURAL VOLUNTEER FIRE DEPARTMENT ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

Sec. 614.101. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Director" means the director of the Texas Forest Service of The Texas A&M University System.

(2) "Fund" means the volunteer fire department assistance fund.

(3) "Program" means the Rural Volunteer Fire Department Assistance Program.

(4) "Service" means the Texas Forest Service of The Texas A&M University System.

(5) "Part-paid fire department" means a fire department operated by its members, some of whom are volunteers and not more than 20 of whom are paid.

(6) "Volunteer fire department" means a fire department operated by its members, including a part-paid fire department, that is operated on a not-for-profit basis, including a department that is exempt from federal income tax under Section 501(a), Internal Revenue Code of 1986, by being listed as an exempt organization in Section 501(c)(3) of that code.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1129, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 614.071 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(79), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 614.102. ADMINISTRATION OF PROGRAM. (a) The Texas A&M Forest Service shall administer the program established under this subchapter, and the director may adopt rules necessary to assist volunteer fire departments in paying for equipment, including the replacement or repair of equipment, and training of personnel, including by providing emergency assistance under Section 614.103(a-1).

(b) The service may employ staff to administer the program.

(c) The director shall:

(1) determine reasonable criteria and qualifications for the distribution of money from the volunteer fire department assistance fund, including:

(A) the frequency, size, and severity of past wildfires in a volunteer fire department's jurisdiction;

(B) the potential for loss or damage to property resulting from future wildfires in the department's jurisdiction;

(C) the age of the equipment used by the department; and

(D) the department's need for emergency assistance under Section 614.103(a-1); and

(2) establish a procedure for reporting and processing requests for money from the fund.

(c-1) In determining criteria and qualifications for the distribution of money under Subsection (c), the director shall consider the state's most recent Southern Wildfire Risk Assessment issued by the Southern Group of State Foresters and other applicable information.

(c-2) The service may designate a portion of the fund to be used to assist volunteer fire departments in meeting cost share requirements for federal grants for which the departments qualify. The director shall determine a set of needs-based criteria for determining a department's eligibility to apply for a grant under this subsection. The criteria must include:

(1) the size of the department;

(2) the department's annual budget and source of revenue; and

(3) the amount by which the department would benefit from the grant.

(d) A volunteer fire department may not be denied assistance from the fund solely because the department receives funds from a political subdivision.

(e) The director shall prepare an annual written report on the activity, status, and effectiveness of the fund and shall submit the report to the lieutenant governor and the speaker of the house of representatives before November 1 of each year.

(f) Any assistance or benefits provided under this subchapter to a volunteer fire department or a firefighter who is a member of a volunteer fire department may not be considered compensation, and a firefighter receiving assistance under this subchapter may not be considered to be in the paid service of any governing body.

(g) Administration costs associated with the program during a state fiscal year may not exceed seven percent of the total revenue collected from the assessment under Article 5.102, Insurance Code, during the previous fiscal year.

(h) Except as otherwise provided by this subsection, at least 10 percent of appropriations for a state fiscal year from the fund for the purpose of providing assistance to volunteer fire departments under the program is allocated for providing emergency assistance under Section 614.103(a-1). If the amount of assistance requested under Section 614.103(a-1) in a state fiscal year is less than the amount allocated under this subsection, the remaining amount may be used for other types of requests for assistance.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1129, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 614.072 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(79), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 52 (S.B. 646), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1312 (S.B. 59), Sec. 39, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 877 (H.B. 3070), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 470 (H.B. 430), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 614.103. REQUESTS FOR ASSISTANCE. (a) A request for assistance from the fund shall be submitted to the director.

(a-1) A volunteer fire department whose equipment is damaged or lost in responding to a declared state of disaster under Section 418.014 in an area subject to the declaration may submit a request for emergency assistance from the fund for:

(1) the replacement or repair of damaged or lost personal protective equipment or other firefighting equipment; and

(2) the purchase of a machine to clean personal protective equipment.

(b) On receiving a request for assistance, the director shall determine whether to provide assistance and the amount of the assistance to be provided, if any, based on the criteria developed under Section 614.102. A written copy of the decision shall be sent to the requestor.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1129, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 614.073 and amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(79), 3(27), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 877 (H.B. 3070), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 614.104. FUND. (a) The volunteer fire department assistance fund is an account in the general revenue fund and is composed of money collected under Chapter 2007, Insurance Code, and contributions to the fund from any other source.

(b) Except as provided by Subsections (c) and (d), money in the fund may be used only for a purpose under this subchapter.

(c) The service may expend an amount not to exceed $5 million each year from the fund for staffing and operating costs associated with the preparation and delivery of the service's statewide wildfire protection plan.

(d) Money in the fund may be appropriated for a contribution to the Texas Emergency Services Retirement System subject to Section 865.015.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1129, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 614.074 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(79), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1000 (H.B. 4002), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 448 (H.B. 7), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 614.105. SEPARATE ACCOUNT FOR MONEY FROM TEXAS COMMISSION ON FIRE PROTECTION. (a) The service shall maintain a separate account within the volunteer fire department assistance fund.

(b) The account shall contain money:

(1) previously appropriated to the Texas Commission on Fire Protection for the administration of the fire department emergency program and transferred to the service;

(2) received from the repayment of outstanding loans transferred to the service from the Texas Commission on Fire Protection fire department emergency program; and

(3) from any legislative appropriations for the purposes of Subsection (c).

(c) The money in the account may be used only to award grants for scholarships for the education and training of firefighters or for purchasing necessary firefighting equipment and facilities for:

(1) a municipal fire department with any number of paid personnel;

(2) a fire department operated by its members, some of whom are volunteers and some of whom are paid; or

(3) a volunteer fire department.

(d) The service shall administer all outstanding loans transferred from the Texas Commission on Fire Protection fire department emergency program and deposit money obtained as repayment of those loans to the credit of the account created under this section.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1216 (S.B. 1011), Sec. 25, eff. January 1, 2010.

Sec. 614.106. RULES; APPLICABILITY OF ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE ACT. The director shall adopt rules for the administration of the program authorized by this chapter in accordance with Chapter 2001. The rules must ensure public participation, transparency, and accountability in administration of the program.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 52 (S.B. 646), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER H. PEACE OFFICER IDENTIFICATION CARDS

Sec. 614.121. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

Text of subdivision effective until January 01, 2025

(1) "Full-time peace officer" means a person elected, employed, or appointed as a peace officer under Article 2.12, Code of Criminal Procedure, or other law, who:

(A) works as a peace officer on average at least 32 hours per week, exclusive of paid vacation; and

(B) is compensated by this state or a political subdivision of this state at least at the federal minimum wage and is entitled to all employee benefits offered to a peace officer by the state or political subdivision.

Text of subdivision effective on January 01, 2025

(1) "Full-time peace officer" means a person elected, employed, or appointed as a peace officer under Article 2A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure, or other law, who:

(A) works as a peace officer on average at least 32 hours per week, exclusive of paid vacation; and

(B) is compensated by this state or a political subdivision of this state at least at the federal minimum wage and is entitled to all employee benefits offered to a peace officer by the state or political subdivision.

Text of subdivision effective until January 01, 2025

(2) "Honorably retired peace officer" means a former peace officer who:

(A) previously served but is not currently serving as an elected, appointed, or employed peace officer under Article 2.12, Code of Criminal Procedure, or other law;

(B) did not retire in lieu of any disciplinary action;

(C) was eligible to retire from a law enforcement agency in this state or was ineligible to retire only as a result of an injury received in the course of the officer's employment with the agency; and

(D) is eligible to receive a pension or annuity for service as a law enforcement officer in this state or is ineligible to receive a pension or annuity only because the law enforcement agency that employed the officer does not offer a pension or annuity to its employees.

Text of subdivision effective on January 01, 2025

(2) "Honorably retired peace officer" means a former peace officer who:

(A) previously served but is not currently serving as an elected, appointed, or employed peace officer under Article 2A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure, or other law;

(B) did not retire in lieu of any disciplinary action;

(C) was eligible to retire from a law enforcement agency in this state or was ineligible to retire only as a result of an injury received in the course of the officer's employment with the agency; and

(D) is eligible to receive a pension or annuity for service as a law enforcement officer in this state or is ineligible to receive a pension or annuity only because the law enforcement agency that employed the officer does not offer a pension or annuity to its employees.

Text of subdivision effective until January 01, 2025

(3) "Part-time peace officer" means a person elected, employed, or appointed as a peace officer under Article 2.12, Code of Criminal Procedure, or other law, who:

(A) works as a peace officer on average less than 32 hours per week, exclusive of paid vacation; and

(B) is compensated by this state or a political subdivision of this state at least at the federal minimum wage and is entitled to all employee benefits offered to a peace officer by the state or political subdivision.

Text of subdivision effective on January 01, 2025

(3) "Part-time peace officer" means a person elected, employed, or appointed as a peace officer under Article 2A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure, or other law, who:

(A) works as a peace officer on average less than 32 hours per week, exclusive of paid vacation; and

(B) is compensated by this state or a political subdivision of this state at least at the federal minimum wage and is entitled to all employee benefits offered to a peace officer by the state or political subdivision.

(3-a) "Qualified retired law enforcement officer" has the meaning assigned by 18 U.S.C. Section 926C.

(4) "Reserve law enforcement officer" has the meaning assigned by Section 1701.001, Occupations Code.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 938 (H.B. 3613), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1109 (H.B. 3212), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.108, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 614.122. PEACE OFFICERS. (a) The law enforcement agency or other governmental entity that appoints or employs a peace officer shall issue an identification card to its full-time or part-time peace officers.

(b) The identification card must include:

(1) the full name of the peace officer;

(2) a photograph of the peace officer consistent with the peace officer's appearance;

(3) the name of the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity that appointed or employs the peace officer or that the peace officer was elected to serve;

(4) if applicable, the signature of the person appointing or employing the person as a peace officer on behalf of the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity;

(5) a brief description of the peace officer, including the peace officer's height, weight, and eye color;

(6) the thumbprint of the peace officer or a bar code with a unique identification label for the peace officer;

(7) the date the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity appointed or employed the peace officer;

(8) the date the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity issued the card to the peace officer; and

(9) a phone number operational 24 hours a day, seven days a week that a person may call to verify the validity of the identification card.

(c) On the identification card, the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity that issues the card shall print:

(1) "State of Texas" and the state seal; and

(2) "This identification card certifies that (insert name of peace officer) is commissioned by (insert name of law enforcement agency or other governmental entity that appoints or employs the peace officer) as a (insert "full-time peace officer" or "part-time peace officer")."

(d) The head of a law enforcement agency or other governmental entity that appoints or employs a peace officer shall recover the identification card at the time of the peace officer's resignation or termination.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 938 (H.B. 3613), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 614.123. RESERVE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER. (a) The law enforcement agency or other governmental entity that appoints or employs a reserve law enforcement officer shall issue an identification card to its reserve law enforcement officers.

(b) The identification card must include:

(1) the full name of the reserve law enforcement officer;

(2) a photograph of the reserve law enforcement officer consistent with the reserve law enforcement officer's appearance;

(3) the name of the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity that appointed or employs the reserve law enforcement officer;

(4) if applicable, the signature of the person appointing or employing the person as a reserve law enforcement officer on behalf of the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity;

(5) a brief description of the reserve law enforcement officer, including the reserve law enforcement officer's height, weight, and eye color;

(6) the thumbprint of the reserve law enforcement officer or a bar code with a unique identification label for the reserve law enforcement officer;

(7) the date the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity appointed or employed the reserve law enforcement officer;

(8) the date the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity issued the card to the reserve law enforcement officer; and

(9) a phone number operational 24 hours a day, seven days a week that a person may call to verify the validity of the identification card.

(c) On the identification card, the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity that issues the card shall print:

(1) "State of Texas" and the state seal; and

(2) "This identification card certifies that (insert name of reserve law enforcement officer) is commissioned by (insert name of law enforcement agency or other governmental entity that appoints or employs the reserve law enforcement officer) as a reserve law enforcement officer."

(d) The head of a law enforcement agency or other governmental entity that appoints or employs a reserve law enforcement officer shall recover the identification card at the time of the reserve law enforcement officer's resignation or termination.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 938 (H.B. 3613), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 614.124. HONORABLY RETIRED PEACE OFFICER. (a) On request of an honorably retired peace officer who holds a certificate of proficiency under Section 1701.357, Occupations Code, the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity that was the last entity to appoint or employ the honorably retired peace officer as a peace officer shall issue an identification card to the honorably retired peace officer.

(b) The identification card must include:

(1) the full name of the honorably retired peace officer;

(2) a photograph of the honorably retired peace officer consistent with the honorably retired peace officer's appearance;

(3) the name of the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity that issued the card to the honorably retired peace officer;

(4) if applicable, the signature of the person authorizing the issuance of the card on behalf of the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity to the honorably retired peace officer;

(5) a brief description of the honorably retired peace officer, including the honorably retired peace officer's height, weight, and eye color;

(6) the thumbprint of the honorably retired peace officer or a bar code with a unique identification label for the honorably retired peace officer;

(7) the date the honorably retired peace officer last served as a peace officer for the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity;

(8) the date the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity issued the card to the honorably retired peace officer; and

(9) a phone number operational 24 hours a day, seven days a week that a person may call to verify the validity of the identification card.

(c) On the identification card, the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity that issues the card shall print:

(1) "State of Texas" and the state seal; and

(2) "This identification card certifies that (insert name of honorably retired peace officer) is an honorably retired peace officer of (insert name of law enforcement agency or other governmental entity that last appointed or employed the honorably retired peace officer)."

(d) The head of a law enforcement agency or other governmental entity that issued the identification card shall recover the identification card on the date the identification card expires.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 938 (H.B. 3613), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 738 (H.B. 1083), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 614.1241. QUALIFIED RETIRED LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER. (a) On request of a qualified retired law enforcement officer who holds a certificate of proficiency under Section 1701.357, Occupations Code, a law enforcement agency or other governmental entity in this state shall issue an identification card to the qualified retired law enforcement officer if the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity:

(1) was the last entity to appoint or employ the qualified retired law enforcement officer as a peace officer; or

(2) appointed or employed the qualified retired law enforcement officer for 20 years or more and the officer is receiving retirement or pension benefits as a result of that service.

(b) The identification card must include:

(1) the full name of the qualified retired law enforcement officer;

(2) a photograph of the qualified retired law enforcement officer consistent with the qualified retired law enforcement officer's appearance;

(3) the name of the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity that issued the card to the qualified retired law enforcement officer;

(4) if applicable, the signature of the person authorizing the issuance of the card on behalf of the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity to the qualified retired law enforcement officer;

(5) a brief description of the qualified retired law enforcement officer, including the qualified retired law enforcement officer's height, weight, and eye color;

(6) the thumbprint of the qualified retired law enforcement officer or a bar code with a unique identification label for the qualified retired law enforcement officer;

(7) the date the qualified retired law enforcement officer last served as a peace officer for the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity;

(8) the date the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity issued the card to the qualified retired law enforcement officer; and

(9) a phone number operational 24 hours a day, seven days a week, that a person may call to verify the validity of the identification card.

(c) On the identification card, the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity that issues the card shall print:

(1) "State of Texas" and the state seal; and

(2) "This identification card certifies that (insert name of qualified retired law enforcement officer) is a qualified retired law enforcement officer of (insert name of law enforcement agency or other governmental entity that last appointed or employed the qualified retired law enforcement officer)."

(d) The head of a law enforcement agency or other governmental entity that issued the identification card shall recover the identification card on the date the identification card expires.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1109 (H.B. 3212), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 614.125. EXPIRATION DATE. An identification card issued under this subchapter expires on a date specified by the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity issuing the card.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 938 (H.B. 3613), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 614.126. TAMPER-PROOF CARDS. An identification card issued under this subchapter must be, to the extent practicable, tamper-proof.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 938 (H.B. 3613), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 614.127. LOST OR STOLEN CARDS. If an identification card issued under this subchapter is lost or stolen, the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity that issued the card to the peace officer, reserve law enforcement officer, honorably retired peace officer, or qualified retired law enforcement officer shall issue a duplicate identification card to the officer if the officer submits an affidavit executed by the officer to the law enforcement agency or other governmental entity stating that the identification card was lost or stolen.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 938 (H.B. 3613), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 288 (H.B. 1417), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1109 (H.B. 3212), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER I. FIRE DEPARTMENT LISTING

Sec. 614.151. PURPOSES OF SUBCHAPTER. The purposes of this subchapter are to:

(1) develop a complete list of fire departments and firefighting resources within this state;

(2) prepare for the prompt and efficient response to a disaster or incident of catastrophic proportions; and

(3) provide support to the statewide mutual aid program for fire emergencies as provided by Section 418.110.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1215 (H.B. 1915), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 614.152. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Fire department" means an entity that provides fire protection to an area within the state that has 9-1-1 service as determined by the Commission on State Emergency Communications.

(2) "Service" means the Texas Forest Service of The Texas A&M University System.

(3) "State fire agency" means the:

(A) Office of Rural Affairs established in the Department of Agriculture;

(B) service;

(C) Texas Commission on Fire Protection;

(D) Texas A&M Engineering Extension Service; and

(E) Texas State Fire Marshal's Office of the Texas Department of Insurance.

(4) "State fire association" means the:

(A) State Firemen's and Fire Marshals' Association of Texas;

(B) Texas Fire Chiefs Association;

(C) Texas Fire Marshals Association;

(D) Texas State Association of Fire and Emergency Districts; and

(E) Texas State Association of Fire Fighters.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1215 (H.B. 1915), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (H.B. 1918), Sec. 94, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1316 (S.B. 220), Sec. 3.03, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 614.153. ADMINISTRATION OF FIRE DEPARTMENT LISTING. The service shall:

(1) establish and maintain a listing of fire departments located in this state that is accessible to each state fire agency to assist the agency in carrying out its responsibilities; and

(2) prescribe procedures necessary to implement this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1215 (H.B. 1915), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 614.154. LISTING REQUIRED. (a) Each fire department in this state must be listed with the service. Each fire department shall provide to the service information described by Section 614.155 in a manner prescribed by the service.

(b) State fire agencies and state fire associations shall coordinate and cooperate with the service in the development of the listing.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1215 (H.B. 1915), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 614.155. LISTING COMPONENTS. The listing must contain for each fire department in this state:

(1) the name of the fire department;

(2) the physical address of the fire department;

(3) the mailing address of the fire department;

(4) the number of firefighters and any other personnel affiliated with the fire department whose duties involve responding to an emergency incident; and

(5) an itemized list, using National Incident Management System guidelines, of all firefighting equipment used by the fire department for fire protection purposes.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1215 (H.B. 1915), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 614.156. RENEWAL OF LISTING. The service shall renew a fire department's listing annually.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1215 (H.B. 1915), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER J. STANDARDS FOR CERTAIN LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS

Sec. 614.171. DEFINITIONS.In this subchapter:

(1) "Law enforcement agency" means the Department of Public Safety, Texas Alcoholic Beverage Commission, Texas Department of Criminal Justice, Parks and Wildlife Department, and the office of the attorney general.

(2) "Law enforcement officer" means a person who is a commissioned peace officer employed by a law enforcement agency.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2007.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 614.151 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(41), eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 6.04, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 497 (H.B. 2154), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 614.172. PHYSICAL FITNESS PROGRAMS AND STANDARDS. (a) Each law enforcement agency shall adopt physical fitness programs that a law enforcement officer must participate in and physical fitness standards that a law enforcement officer must meet. The standards as applied to an officer must directly relate to the officer's job duties and shall include individual fitness goals specific to the officer's age and gender. A law enforcement agency shall use the services of a consultant to aid the agency in developing the standards.

(a-1) Each law enforcement agency shall adopt a reward policy that provides for reward incentives to officers who participate in the program and meet the standards adopted under Subsection (a). The reward incentives under the policy must be an amount of administrative leave of not more than four days per year.

(a-2) An agency may adopt physical readiness standards independent of other law enforcement agencies.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), a violation of a standard adopted under Subsection (a) is just cause to discharge an officer or:

(1) transfer an officer to a position that is not compensated according to Schedule C of the position classification salary schedule prescribed by the General Appropriations Act; or

(2) for a law enforcement officer employed by the Parks and Wildlife Department and compensated according to Schedule B of the position classification salary schedule prescribed by the General Appropriations Act, transfer the officer to a position that does not require the employee to be a commissioned peace officer.

(c) A law enforcement agency may exempt a law enforcement officer from participating in a program or meeting a standard under Subsection (a) based on the facts and circumstances of the individual case, including whether an officer was injured in the line of duty.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2007.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 614.152 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(41), eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 6.05, eff. September 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER K. INSURANCE COVERAGE REQUIRED FOR

VOLUNTEER POLICE FORCE MEMBERS

Sec. 614.191. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "volunteer police force member" means:

(1) a person summoned under Section 341.011, Local Government Code, to serve on a special police force;

(2) a police reserve force member appointed under Section 341.012, Local Government Code; and

(3) any other person assigned by a state agency or political subdivision to perform, without compensation, any duties typically performed by a peace officer.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1248 (H.B. 2667), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 614.121 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(42), eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 614.192. INSURANCE COVERAGE REQUIRED. (a) Each volunteer police force member must be insured or covered by the applicable state agency or political subdivision against any injury suffered by the police force member in the course and scope of performing the person's assigned duties at the request of or under a contract with a state agency or political subdivision.

(b) The applicable state agency or political subdivision may satisfy the requirements of Subsection (a) by:

(1) providing insurance coverage; or

(2) entering into an interlocal agreement with another political subdivision providing for self-insurance.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1248 (H.B. 2667), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 614.122 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(42), eff. September 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER L. RETIREMENT OF LAW ENFORCEMENT ANIMAL

Sec. 614.211. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Head of a law enforcement agency" means the highest-ranking peace officer in a law enforcement agency, including the director, sheriff, constable, or police chief, as applicable.

(2) "Law enforcement agency" means an office, department, or other division of this state or a political subdivision of this state, including a county, municipality, school district, or hospital district, that is authorized by law to employ peace officers.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 36 (S.B. 2100), Sec. 1, eff. May 14, 2019.

Sec. 614.212. SUITABILITY AND ELIGIBILITY OF ANIMAL. (a) The governing body of a state agency or political subdivision may enter into a contract with a person for the transfer of a law enforcement dog, horse, or other animal that has been determined by the applicable head of a law enforcement agency or that person's designee to be:

(1) suitable for transfer, after consulting with the animal's veterinarian, handlers, and other caretakers; and

(2) surplus to the needs of the state agency or political subdivision because the animal is:

(A) at the end of the animal's working life; or

(B) subject to circumstances that justify making the animal available for transfer before the end of the animal's working life, including:

(i) the death of the animal's handler in the line of duty or as a result of injuries sustained in the line of duty; or

(ii) the medical retirement of the animal's handler as a result of injuries sustained in the line of duty.

(b) The head of a state law enforcement agency may execute a contract under this subchapter on behalf of the state agency.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 36 (S.B. 2100), Sec. 1, eff. May 14, 2019.

Sec. 614.213. TRANSFEREE. (a) A law enforcement animal determined to be suitable and eligible for transfer under Section 614.212 may be transferred only to a person who is:

(1) capable of humanely caring for the animal; and

(2) selected by the applicable head of a law enforcement agency or that person's designee in the following order of priority, as applicable:

(A) the animal's former handler who medically retired as a result of injuries sustained in the line of duty;

(B) the parent, child, spouse, or sibling of the animal's former handler if the handler was killed in the line of duty or died from injuries sustained in the line of duty;

(C) a former handler not described by Paragraph (A);

(D) a peace officer, county jailer, or telecommunicator other than the animal's handler; or

(E) another person.

(b) If more than one person in a category of authorized transferees under Subsection (a)(2) requests to receive the animal, the applicable head of a law enforcement agency or that person's designee shall determine which of the potential transferees would best serve the best interest of the animal and the applicable state agency or political subdivision.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 36 (S.B. 2100), Sec. 1, eff. May 14, 2019.

Sec. 614.214. CONTRACT. A contract for a transfer under this subchapter:

(1) may provide for the transfer without charge to the transferee;

(2) must require the transferee to:

(A) humanely care for the animal, including providing food, shelter, and regular and appropriate veterinary care, including medication, to properly provide for the animal's health;

(B) comply with all state and local laws applicable to keeping domestic animals; and

(C) notify the applicable state agency or political subdivision if the transferee is no longer able to humanely care for the animal; and

(3) must require the applicable state agency or political subdivision to take possession of the animal on:

(A) receipt of the notice under Subdivision (2)(C); or

(B) a finding by the governing body of the state agency or political subdivision that the transferee is no longer able to humanely care for the animal.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 36 (S.B. 2100), Sec. 1, eff. May 14, 2019.

Sec. 614.215. LIABILITY. A state agency or political subdivision that transfers an animal under this subchapter:

(1) is not liable in a civil action for any damages arising from the transfer, including damages arising from the animal's law enforcement training; and

(2) is not liable for veterinary expenses of the transferred animal, including expenses associated with care for a condition of the animal that existed before or at the time of transfer, regardless of whether the applicable law enforcement agency, state agency, or political subdivision was aware of the condition.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 36 (S.B. 2100), Sec. 1, eff. May 14, 2019.

Sec. 614.216. EFFECT OF SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter does not:

(1) require an animal to be transferred under this subchapter;

(2) affect a state agency's or political subdivision's authority to care for retired law enforcement animals; or

(3) waive sovereign or governmental immunity to suit and from liability of the state agency or political subdivision transferring an animal.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 36 (S.B. 2100), Sec. 1, eff. May 14, 2019.

Sec. 614.217. EFFECT OF SURPLUS OR SALVAGE LAW. Subchapter D, Chapter 2175, of this code, Subchapter D, Chapter 263, Local Government Code, and other similar laws regarding the disposition of surplus or salvage property do not apply to the transfer of a law enforcement animal under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 36 (S.B. 2100), Sec. 1, eff. May 14, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER M. ACCOMPANYING OR FILMING OF PEACE OFFICERS

Sec. 614.231. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Law enforcement agency" means an agency of this state or a political subdivision of this state that employs peace officers other than game wardens.

(2) "Reality television program" means a nonfictional television program that features the same live subjects over the course of more than one episode primarily for entertainment purposes, but does not include reporting on a matter of public concern by a journalist as defined by Article 38.11, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 134 (H.B. 54), Sec. 2, eff. May 26, 2021.

Sec. 614.232. ACCOMPANYING AND FILMING PEACE OFFICERS FOR REALITY TELEVISION PROGRAM PROHIBITED. A law enforcement agency may not authorize a person to accompany and film a peace officer acting in the line of duty for the purpose of producing a reality television program.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 134 (H.B. 54), Sec. 2, eff. May 26, 2021.